Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2063.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5762YH (2) 91 th/ns H.F. 2063 Section 1. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION ââ STUDY COMMITTEE 1 ââ IMPLEMENTING WILDLIFE CROSSINGS AT HIGHWAY LOCATIONS. 2 1. The department of transportation shall convene a 3 study committee to produce a report on the feasibility and 4 cost-effectiveness of implementing wildlife crossings at 5 certain highway locations with high rates of vehicle crashes 6 involving animals. The study committee shall consider 7 costs incurred due to injuries to humans and property damage 8 resulting from vehicle crashes involving animals and the 9 potential savings that could be realized when determining 10 whether wildlife crossings are feasible and cost-effective. 11 The department of transportation shall file the study 12 committeeâs report with the general assembly on or before 13 January 11, 2027. 14 2. This section is repealed July 1, 2027. 15